District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.02

Unique identifier required.

Each licensee and registrant under the Banking Code shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the NMLS.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 3, 61 DCR 12577

History